Hawaii statutes.
§460J-14 Fees; biennial renewal; inactive
license. (a) The biennial renewal fee shall be paid to the board on or
before June 30 of each even-numbered year. Failure, neglect, or refusal of any
duly licensed operator to pay the biennial renewal fee shall constitute a
forfeiture of the person's license. Any license may be restored upon written
application therefor within one year from the due date of the renewal fee and
the payment of the delinquent fee plus an amount equal to ten per cent thereof.

(b) Upon written request of a licensee, the
board may place the licensee's active license on an inactive status. The
licensee, upon request and payment of the inactive license fee may continue on
inactive status. The license may be reactivated at any time by making a
written request to the board and by fulfilling the requirements established by
the board, including the payment of the appropriate fees. During the inactive
period, a licensee on inactive status shall not engage in the practice of pest
control that would require a license. Any person who violates this prohibition
shall be subject to discipline under this chapter and the board's rules.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, the
dishonoring of any check upon first deposit shall constitute a failure to meet
the fee requirements. Failure, neglect, or refusal of any licensee on inactive
status to pay the inactive license fee shall constitute a forfeiture of the
license. [L 1972, c 134, pt of §1; am L 1975, c 118, §24; am L 1976, c 98, §2;
am L 1982, c 204, §8; am L 1983, c 124, §17; am L 1984, c 7, §61; am L 1992, c
202, §132; am L 1997, c 84, §4]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next